Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Promotion of the Arts

153.210.
Definitions for KRS 153.210 to 153.235.

As used in KRS 153.210 to 153.235:

The term “the arts” means endeavors which involve the application of skills or practice of esthetic principles or theories in the expression of beauty in form, color, sound, speech, or movement with a desired end of creating objects of imagination or taste for their own sake and without relation to the utility of the object produced. If the above stated criteria are met, the term “the arts” may include, but is not limited to, the following specific activities: music (all forms, and instrumental or vocal), dance, drama, folk art, creative writing, painting, sculpture, photography, graphic and craft arts, costume and fashion design, motion pictures, television, radio, tape and sound recording, and the arts related to the presentation, performance, execution, and exhibition of major art forms.

The term “production” means plays (with or without music), ballet, dance and choral performances, concerts, recitals, operas, exhibitions, readings, motion pictures, television, radio, tape and sound recordings, and any other activities involving the execution or rendition of the arts in the Commonwealth, and meeting the standards that may be approved by the council hereinafter established by KRS 153.210 to 153.235.

The term “project” means any programs organized to carry out the purposes of KRS 153.210 to 153.235, including programs to foster Kentucky’s artistic creativity, to commission works of art with a pertinence to Kentucky, to create opportunities for residents of the Commonwealth to develop artistic talents when carried on as a part of a program otherwise included in this definition, and to develop and enhance public knowledge and understanding in the Commonwealth of the arts. It also includes, where appropriate, the rental, purchase, or other acquisition of real property or any interest therein, and the rental, purchase, or other acquisition of equipment, supplies, materials, and other personal property.

The term “workshop” means a production, the primary purpose of which is to encourage the artistic development of amateur, student, or other nonprofessional participants who are residents of the Commonwealth.

The term “group” may include any state or other public agency, and any nonprofit society, institution, organization, association, museum, or establishment in Kentucky, whether or not incorporated.

History.
Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 87, § 2(1); 1992, ch. 159, § 5, effective July 14, 1992.

153.215.
Kentucky Arts Council — Functions — Purpose — Members — Compensation — Officers — Meetings.

There is established the Kentucky Arts Council (hereinafter referred to as “the council”) which shall perform functions pursuant to KRS 153.210 to 153.235.

The purpose of the council shall be to develop and promote a broadly conceived state policy of support for the arts in Kentucky pursuant to KRS 153.210 to 153.235.

The Governor shall appoint members to the council. The council shall consist of not more than fifteen (15) members who have an interest in the arts and have the ability and experience to provide broad expertise in operation of the council. Members shall reflect the diverse interests of the arts community to the extent such diversity is possible. At least one (1) member shall represent each of the following areas: education, economic development, and workforce development. The Governor shall appoint three (3) members for a term to expire on November 18, 2017;
five (5) members for a term to expire on November 18, 2018; four (4) members for a term to expire on November 18, 2019; and three (3) members for a term to expire on November 18, 2020. Thereafter the Governor shall make all appointments for a term of four (4) years

Council members shall not receive any compensation for their services, but may be reimbursed in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapters 44 and 45 for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties under KRS 153.210 to 153.235.

From the council membership the Governor shall appoint a chair and a vice chair of the council who shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor. The council may elect by majority vote other officers deemed necessary. The chair shall not be represented by a proxy. Should the chair be unavailable, the vice chair shall serve in the chair’s stead.

The council shall meet at the call of the chair , but not less often than three (3) times during each calendar year. A majority of the members appointed to the council shall constitute a quorum.

The council shall be attached to the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet as a department within the meaning of KRS Chapter 12.

The council shall be headed by an executive director appointed by the secretary of the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet and confirmed by majority vote of the council.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 87, § 2(2) to (8); 1972, ch. 102, § 1; 1982, ch. 396, § 28, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 159, § 6, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 194, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 283, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 95, § 30, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 16, § 34, effective June 25, 2009; 2017 ch. 132, § 1, effective June 29, 2017.

153.220.
Duties and functions of arts council.

The duties and functions of the arts council shall be to:

Stimulate and encourage throughout the state the study and presentation of the arts, and foster public interest and participation therein;

Encourage public interest in the cultural heritage of our state and expand the state’s cultural resources;

Encourage and assist freedom of artistic expression essential for the well-being of the arts;

Serve as the sole agency in the Commonwealth for administration of a state arts plan developed in coordination with the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet;

Establish standards and procedures and advisory committees as necessary to advise the Governor on the selection of the Kentucky poet laureate or writer laureate;

Advise the Governor on matters pertaining to the arts;

Adopt and promulgate regulations for the performance of its duties and functions provided in KRS 153.210 to 153.235;

Receive federal grants, and other money and property of any nature whatsoever which may be given, donated, conveyed, bequeathed, devised, or otherwise transferred, without condition or restriction, except that provided by law, other than that it be used for some purpose of the council as permitted by KRS 153.210 to 153.235;

Contract from time to time, as appropriate, with experts and consultants who may be utilized as deemed necessary, and make other necessary purchases and expenditures, all in accordance with the state plan approved by the secretary of the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet and with the state purchasing provisions of KRS Chapters 45 and 45A;

Hold public and private hearings for the purpose of furthering the objectives of the council’s programs; and

Make and sign any agreements, subject to the provisions of KRS Chapters 45 and 45A, and do and perform any acts that may be necessary to carry out the purposes of KRS 153.210 to 153.235.

History.
Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 87, § 2(9); 1982, ch. 396, § 29, effective July 15, 1982; 1990, ch. 65, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 159, § 7, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 209, § 9, effective July 15, 1994; 2006, ch. 211, § 60, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 16, § 35, effective June 25, 2009.

153.225.
Receipt and disbursement of federal funds.

The council is the official agency of the Commonwealth to receive and disburse any funds made available to the state government by the federal government for any programs related to the arts; provided, however, that such funds are not expressly intended for some other agency of the Commonwealth, or that some other agency is not deemed a more appropriate recipient.

History.
Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 87, § 2(10); 1982, ch. 396, § 30, effective July 15, 1982.

153.230.
Annual report of council.

The council shall submit an annual report to the Governor before the 15th day of August each year, summarizing the council’s activities, expenditures, and grants of money or property from all sources for the preceding year, including such recommendations as the council deems appropriate.

History.
Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 87, § 2(11); 1982, ch. 396, § 31, effective July 15, 1982.

153.233.
Entity producing or financing arts and
receiving $25,000 or less from state or local governmental units —
Exemption from open meetings and open records requirements.

An entity involved in producing or financing arts on a local or statewide
basis, since the inception of fiscal year 2004-2005, which received
a total of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or less as a result
of appropriations or grants from state or local governmental units,
shall be exempt from the requirements of:

KRS 61.805 to 61.850; and

KRS 61.870 to 61.884.

HISTORY:
2018 ch. 171, § 18, effective April 14, 2018; enacted by 2018 ch. 207, § 18, effective April 27, 2018.

153.235.
Grants-in-aid to promote the arts — Funds, how handled — Property, how held.

The council may establish and carry out a program of grants-in-aid to groups or, in appropriate cases, to individuals engaged in or concerned with the arts for the purpose of enabling them to provide or support in Kentucky any of the following:

Productions which have substantial artistic and cultural significance, giving emphasis to creativity and the maintenance and encouragement of professional excellence;

Projects which will encourage and assist artists and enable them to achieve standards of professional excellence;

Workshops which will encourage and develop the appreciation and enjoyment of the arts by residents of the Commonwealth; and

Other relevant projects, giving emphasis to creativity, including surveys, research, and planning in the arts.

Any group or individual desirous of receiving a grant-in-aid must submit an application to the council that shall contain such data as the council may require.

The receipt, control, and expenditure of funds shall be subject to the general provisions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes governing financial administration of all state agencies. Any real property acquired shall be held in the name of the Commonwealth for the use and benefit of the council; and the acquisition, control, or disposal of such property shall be subject to the applicable provisions of KRS Chapters 45, 45A and 56.

History.
Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 87, § 2(12); 1982, ch. 396, § 32, effective July 15, 1982.

153.240.
Department of the Arts — Divisions — Citizens Advisory Board. [Repealed.]